Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska32-549
Joint airport authority board; members; terms; qualifications.

Each airport authority board created pursuant to the Joint Airport Authorities Act shall consist of at least five members from districts as established in section 3-703. Except for members initially appointed pursuant to such section, members of the board shall serve for terms of six years and shall be nominated and elected in the manner provided by law for nonpartisan officers. The terms of all elected members shall commence on the first Thursday after the first Tuesday in January following their election. One member shall be elected at the first general election after creation of the authority, two members at the second general election after creation of the authority, and two members at the third general election after the creation of the authority. The members shall meet the qualifications found in such section.

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 145.

Joint Airport Authorities Act, see section 3-716.